Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 5

Suits Against Representatives

30-2-501. Time limitation for suit — State tax lien.

Other than by filing of claims or the revivor of actions pending against the decedent at the time of the decedent's death, no suits shall be brought or other action taken by any creditor against the estate until the expiration of three (3) months from the issuance of letters, and nothing in this part shall be so construed as to permit the filing of claims or revivor of pending actions, or institution of suits against the personal representative after twelve (12) months from the date of death of the decedent, except, however, for insolvency proceedings or claims filed by creditors within the period prescribed in the notice published or posted in accordance with § 30-2-306(b).

Where any taxes were owed to the state by the decedent at the time of death, any and all property of such decedent, or an amount equal to the proceeds derived from the disposal thereof, shall be subject to the state's common law lien for delinquent taxes for a period of six (6) months following death or until payment within that period, which lien shall be enforceable by distress warrant in accordance with title 67, chapter 1, part 12.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 6; 1947, ch. 137, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.7 (Williams, § 8196.6); Acts 1957, ch. 242, § 1; 1971, ch. 230, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1001; Acts 1989, ch. 395, § 9.

Cross-References. Action against remaining executors after removal of one from state or county, §§ 20-1-112 — 20-1-114.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Revival of action after death of sole executor, § 20-5-114.

Summary judgments for and against executors and administrators, § 25-3-128.

Suspension of limitations during exempt period, § 28-1-110.

Testimony as to transactions with deceased, § 24-1-203.

Wrongful death action, § 20-2-112.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 564, 753, 756, 786, 789.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273 (1979).

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707 (1978).

Wrongful Death Actions in Tennessee (T. A. Smedley), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 447 (1960).

30-2-502. Premature suit — Abatement — Judgment voidable.

To all suits instituted within three (3) months after issuance of letters, the administrator or executor shall plead the prematurity of the action in abatement, or, in default thereof, shall be held liable as for a devastavit, if the estate proves insolvent.

A judgment by confession or by default within the period of three (3) months against an administrator or executor, shall be deemed as to the estate voidable.

Code 1858, §§ 2275, 2276 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 23, § 2); Shan., §§ 4008, 4009; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8221, 8222; modified; C. Supp. 1950, § 8221; Acts 1971, ch. 230, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-1002, 30-1003.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 747, 753.

30-2-503. Revival of judgments against deceased.

Judgments obtained against the deceased in the deceased's lifetime may be revived without delay.

Code 1858, § 2277 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 23, § 3); Shan., § 4010; Code 1932, § 8223; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1004.

Cross-References. Death of codefendant, § 25-4-102.

Judgments revived by and against heirs, when, § 25-4-104.

Proceedings on judgment against deceased, § 30-2-507.

Real assets, subjected to debts sued on before debtor's death, § 30-2-409.

Revival by or against heirs when no personal representative, § 20-5-104.

Revival by or against personal representative, § 20-5-116.

Scire facias, issuance by general sessions judge to review judgments, § 16-15-401.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 754.

30-2-504. Waste or misappropriation of assets by personal representative — Statute of limitation applicable.

Nothing in part 3 of this chapter or § 30-2-501 shall be so construed as to exempt a personal representative from suit by either a creditor or a beneficiary for waste or misappropriation of the assets of the estate or other wrongful act in connection therewith, or to affect any existing statute of limitation applicable to such a suit, or to preclude the enforcement against the property affected by it of any subsisting lien that shall endure beyond the time fixed herein for filing claims.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.13 (Williams, § 8196.10); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1005.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 759, 766, 786.

Collateral References.

Liability of executor or administrator for negligence or default in defending action against estate. 14 A.L.R.3d 1036.

30-2-505. General sessions court's execution against representative — Return made to circuit court.

If a general sessions court judge's execution against an executor or administrator be returned “no property to be found,” the judge who rendered the judgment, or who holds the papers in the cause, shall, on suggestion and application of the plaintiff, the plaintiff's agent or attorney, return the papers to the next circuit court of the plaintiff's county.

Code 1858, § 2271 (deriv. Acts 1822, ch. 43, § 1); Shan., § 4004; Code 1932, § 8217; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1006.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 745, 750.

30-2-506. Proceedings on general sessions court's execution.

Upon the return of papers under § 30-2-505, scire facias shall be issued, and all other proceedings had for the satisfaction of the judgment, either out of the goods and chattels, lands and tenements of the defendant, in case the executor or administrator has wasted the assets, or out of the real estate of the deceased.

Code 1858, § 2272 (deriv. Acts 1822, ch. 43, § 1); Shan., § 4005; Code 1932, § 8218; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1007.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 745, 750.

30-2-507. Proceedings on judgment against deceased.

The like proceeding as provided in § 30-2-506, shall be had in case of an execution issued after the death of the debtor, and returned “nothing to be found,” on a judgment recovered in the debtor's lifetime.

Code 1858, § 2273 (deriv. Acts 1822, ch. 43, § 2); Shan., § 4006; Code 1932, § 8219; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1008.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 745.

Collateral References.

Garnishment against executor or administrator by creditor of estate. 60 A.L.R.3d 1301.